Washington statutes.
RCW 18.52.030

Management and supervision of nursing homes by licensed administrators required.

Nursing homes operating within this state shall be under the active, overall administrative charge and supervision of an on-site full-time administrator licensed as provided in this chapter. No person acting in any capacity, unless the holder of a nursing home administrator's license issued under this chapter, shall be charged with the overall responsibility to make decisions or direct actions involved in managing the internal operation of a nursing home, except as specifically delegated in writing by the administrator to identify a responsible person to act on the administrator's behalf when the administrator is absent. The administrator shall review the decisions upon the administrator's return and amend the decisions if necessary. The board shall define by rule the parameters for on-site full-time administrators in nursing homes with small resident populations, nursing homes in rural areas, nursing homes with small resident populations when the nursing home has converted some of its licensed nursing facility bed capacity for use as assisted living or enhanced assisted living services under chapter 74.39A RCW, or separately licensed facilities collocated on the same campus.

[ 2011 c 366 s 5; 2000 c 93 s 6; 1992 c 53 s 3; 1970 ex.s. c 57 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Conflict with federal requirements—2011 c 366: See notes following RCW 18.20.020.